Virginia statutes. Title 37.2. Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
Article 5. Involuntary Admissions.
§ 37.2-817.2.
(Repealed effective October 1, 2022) Court review of mandatory outpatient treatment plan or discharge plan.

The district court judge or special justice shall hold a hearing within five days after receiving the petition for review of the mandatory outpatient treatment plan or discharge plan; however, if the fifth day is a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday, or day on which the court is lawfully closed, the hearing shall be held by the close of business on the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday, or day on which the court is lawfully closed. If the person is being detained under a temporary detention order, the hearing shall be scheduled within the same time frame provided for a commitment hearing under §

37.2-814

. The clerk shall provide notice of the hearing to the person, the community services board, all treatment providers listed in the comprehensive mandatory outpatient treatment order or discharge plan, and the original petitioner for the person’s involuntary treatment. If the person is not represented by counsel, the court shall appoint an attorney to represent the person in this hearing and any subsequent hearings under §§

37.2-817.3

and

37.2-817.4

, giving consideration to appointing the attorney who represented the person at the proceeding that resulted in the issuance of the mandatory outpatient treatment order or order authorizing discharge to mandatory outpatient treatment following inpatient treatment. The same judge or special justice that presided over the hearing resulting in the mandatory outpatient treatment order or order authorizing discharge to mandatory outpatient treatment following inpatient treatment need not preside at the noncompliance hearing or any subsequent hearings. The community services board shall offer to arrange the person’s transportation to the hearing if the person is not detained and has no other source of transportation.

If requested by the person, the community services board, a treatment provider listed in the comprehensive mandatory outpatient treatment plan or discharge plan, or the original petitioner for the person’s involuntary treatment, the court shall appoint an examiner in accordance with §

37.2-815

who shall personally examine the person and certify to the court whether or not he has probable cause to believe that the person meets the criteria for involuntary inpatient admission or mandatory outpatient treatment as specified in subsections C, C1, C2, and D of §

37.2-817

. The examination shall include all applicable requirements of §

37.2-815

. The certification of the examiner may be admitted into evidence without the appearance of the examiner at the hearing if not objected to by the person or his attorney. If the person is not detained in an inpatient facility, the community services board shall arrange for the person to be examined at a convenient location and time. The community services board shall offer to arrange for the person’s transportation to the examination, if the person has no other source of transportation and resides within the service area or an adjacent service area of the community services board. If the person refuses or fails to appear, the community services board shall notify the court, or a magistrate if the court is not available, and the court or magistrate shall issue a mandatory examination order and capias directing the primary law-enforcement agency in the jurisdiction where the person resides to transport the person to the examination. The person shall remain in custody until a temporary detention order is issued or until the person is released, but in no event shall the period exceed eight hours.

If the person fails to appear for the hearing, the court shall, after consideration of any evidence from the person, from the community services board, or from any treatment provider identified in the mandatory outpatient treatment plan or discharge plan regarding why the person failed to appear at the hearing, either (i) reschedule the hearing pursuant to subsection A, (ii) issue an emergency custody order pursuant to §

37.2-808

, or (iii) issue a temporary detention order pursuant to §

37.2-809

.

After hearing the evidence regarding the person’s material noncompliance with the mandatory outpatient treatment order or order authorizing discharge to mandatory outpatient treatment following inpatient treatment and the person’s current condition, and any other relevant information referenced in subsection C of §

37.2-817

, the judge or special justice shall make one of the following dispositions:

Upon finding by clear and convincing evidence that the person meets the criteria for involuntary admission and treatment specified in subsection C of §

37.2-817

, the judge or special justice shall order the person’s involuntary admission to a facility designated by the community services board for a period of treatment not to exceed 30 days;

Upon finding that the person continues to meet the criteria for mandatory outpatient treatment specified in subsection C1, C2, or D of § 37.2-817, and that a continued period of mandatory outpatient treatment appears warranted, the judge or special justice shall renew the order for mandatory outpatient treatment, making any necessary modifications that are acceptable to the community services board or treatment provider responsible for the person’s treatment. In determining the appropriateness of outpatient treatment, the court may consider the person’s material noncompliance with the previous mandatory treatment order; or

Upon finding that neither of the above dispositions is appropriate, the judge or special justice shall rescind the order for mandatory outpatient treatment or order authorizing discharge to mandatory outpatient treatment following inpatient treatment.Upon entry of an order for involuntary inpatient admission, transportation shall be provided in accordance with §

37.2-829

.

History.

2008, cc. 850, 870; 2009, cc. 112, 697; 2010, cc. 330, 461; 2014, cc. 691, 761; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 221; repealed by 2022, c. 763.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2014, c. 761, cl. 2 provides: “That the Governor’s Task Force on Improving Mental Health Services and Crisis Response created on December 10, 2013, by Executive Order 68 shall identify and examine issues related to the use of law enforcement in the involuntary admission process. The task force shall consider options to reduce the amount of resources needed to detain individuals during the emergency custody order period, including the amount of time spent providing transportation throughout the admission process. Such options shall include developing crisis stabilization units in all regions of the Commonwealth and contracting for retired officers to provide needed transportation. The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to the Governor and the General Assembly by October 1, 2014.”

Acts 2021, Special Session I, c. 221, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 2022, c. 763, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2022.”

Acts 2022, c. 763, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2022.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 112 and 697 are identical and deleted “or

37.2-830

” at the end of the last paragraph.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 330 and 461 are nearly identical, and in subsection A, inserted “or discharge plan” in the first and third sentences, and inserted “or order authorizing discharge to mandatory outpatient treatment following inpatient treatment” in the fourth and fifth sentences; in subsection B, inserted “or discharge plan” and “C1, C2” in the first sentence; inserted “or discharge plan” in subsection C; inserted “or order authorizing discharge to mandatory outpatient treatment following inpatient treatment” in the introductory language of subsection D; inserted “C1, C2, or” in subdivision D 2; and inserted “or order authorizing discharge to mandatory outpatient treatment following inpatient treatment” in subdivision D 3. Subdivision D 2 is set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 691, in subsection A, inserted “or day on which the court is lawfully closed” twice, and made stylistic changes; and in subsection B substituted “eight” for “four” in the last sentence.

The 2014 amendment by c. 761, in subsection B, substituted “eight” for “four” in the last sentence.

§ 37.2-817.2.
(Repealed effective October 1, 2022) Court review of mandatory outpatient treatment plan.

History.

2008, cc. 850, 870; 2009, cc. 112, 697; 2010, cc. 330, 461; 2014, cc. 691, 761; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 221; repealed by 2022, c. 763.

Section repealed effective October 1, 2022.—

This section is repealed effective October 1, 2022, by Acts 2022, 763, cl. 2.

§ 37.2-817.3.
(Repealed effective October 1, 2022) Rescission of mandatory outpatient treatment order.

If the community services board determines at any time prior to the expiration of the mandatory outpatient treatment order or order authorizing discharge to mandatory outpatient treatment following inpatient treatment that the person has complied with the order and no longer meets the criteria for involuntary treatment, or that continued mandatory outpatient treatment is no longer necessary for any other reason, it shall file a petition to rescind the order with the court that entered the order or to which venue has been transferred. If the court agrees with the community services board’s determination, the court shall rescind the order. Otherwise, the court shall schedule a hearing and provide notice of the hearing in accordance with subsection A of §

37.2-817.2

.

At any time after 30 days from entry of the mandatory outpatient treatment order or from the discharge of the person from involuntary inpatient treatment pursuant to an order authorizing discharge to mandatory outpatient treatment following inpatient treatment, the person may petition the court to rescind the order on the grounds that he no longer meets the criteria for mandatory outpatient treatment as specified in subsection C1 or D of §

37.2-817

. The court shall schedule a hearing and provide notice of the hearing in accordance with subsection A of §

37.2-817

.2. The community services board required to monitor the person’s compliance with the mandatory outpatient treatment order or order authorizing discharge to mandatory outpatient treatment following inpatient treatment shall provide a preadmission screening report as required in §

37.2-816

. After observing the person, and considering the person’s current condition, any material noncompliance with the mandatory outpatient treatment order or order authorizing discharge to mandatory outpatient treatment following inpatient treatment on the part of the person, and any other relevant evidence referred to in subsection C of § 37.2-817, shall make one of the dispositions specified in subsection D of §

37.2-817.2

. The person may not file a petition to rescind the order more than once during a 90-day period.

History.

2008, cc. 850, 870; 2010, cc. 330, 461.

Section repealed effective October 1, 2022.—

This section is repealed effective October 1, 2022, by Acts 2022, 763, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Special Session I, c. 221, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2022, c. 763, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2022.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 330 and 461 are identical, and inserted “or order authorizing discharge to mandatory outpatient treatment following inpatient treatment” in the first sentence of subsection A; and in subsection B, inserted “or from the discharge of the person from involuntary inpatient treatment pursuant to an order authorizing discharge to mandatory outpatient treatment following inpatient treatment,” and “C1 or” in the first sentence, and inserted “or order authorizing discharge to mandatory outpatient treatment following inpatient treatment” in the third and fourth sentences.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-2011 Petition for Rescission of Mandatory Outpatient Treatment Order, et seq.

§ 37.2-817.4.
(Effective until October 1, 2022) Continuation of mandatory outpatient treatment order.

At any time within 30 days prior to the expiration of a mandatory outpatient treatment order or order authorizing discharge to mandatory outpatient treatment following inpatient treatment, the community services board that is required to monitor the person’s compliance with the order, the treating physician, or other responsible person may petition the court to continue the order for a period not to exceed 180 days.

If the person who is the subject of the order and the monitoring community services board, if it did not initiate the petition, join the petition, the court shall grant the petition and enter an appropriate order without further hearing. If either the person or the monitoring community services board does not join the petition, the court shall schedule a hearing and provide notice of the hearing in accordance with subsection A of §

37.2-817.2

.

Upon receipt of the petition, the court shall appoint an examiner who shall personally examine the person pursuant to subsection B of §

37.2-815

. The community services board required to monitor the person’s compliance with the mandatory outpatient treatment order or order authorizing discharge to mandatory outpatient treatment following inpatient treatment shall provide a preadmission screening report as required in §

37.2-816

.

If, after observing the person, reviewing the preadmission screening report and considering the appointed examiner’s certification and any other relevant evidence, including any relevant evidence referenced in subsection D of §

37.2-817

, the court shall make one of the dispositions specified in subsection D of §

37.2-817

.2. If the court finds that a continued period of mandatory outpatient treatment is warranted, it may continue the order for a period not to exceed 180 days. Any order of mandatory outpatient treatment that is in effect at the time a petition for continuation of the order is filed shall remain in effect until the disposition of the hearing.

History.

2008, cc. 850, 870; 2010, cc. 330, 461.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective until October 1, 2022. For the version of this section effective October 1, 2022, see the following section, also numbered
§

37.2-817.4

.

For this section as in effect until October 1, 2022,

see the bound volume.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Special Session I, c. 221, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 2022, c. 763, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2022.”

Acts 2022, c. 763, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2022.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 330 and 461 are identical, and inserted “or order authorizing discharge to mandatory outpatient treatment following inpatient treatment” in subsections A and C.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 221, effective July 1, 2022, rewrote subsections A, C, and D.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 763, updated the subsections references throughout.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-2008 Petition to Continue Mandatory Outpatient Treatment Order, et seq.

§ 37.2-817.4.
(Effective October 1, 2022) Continuation of mandatory outpatient treatment order.

At any time within 30 days prior to the expiration of a mandatory outpatient treatment order or order for mandatory outpatient treatment following a period of involuntary inpatient treatment, any person or entity that may file a petition for review of a mandatory outpatient treatment order or order for mandatory outpatient treatment following a period of involuntary inpatient treatment pursuant to subsection D of §

37.2-817.1

may petition the court to continue the order for a period not to exceed 180 days.

If the person who is the subject of the order and the monitoring community services board, if it did not initiate the petition, join the petition, the court shall grant the petition and enter an appropriate order without further hearing. If either the person or the monitoring community services board does not join the petition, the court shall schedule a hearing and provide notice of the hearing in accordance with subsection D of §

37.2-817.1

.

Upon receipt of a contested petition for continuation, the court shall appoint an examiner who shall personally examine the person pursuant to subsection E of §

37.2-817.1

. The community services board required to monitor the person’s adherence to the mandatory outpatient treatment order or order for mandatory outpatient treatment following a period of involuntary inpatient treatment shall provide a report addressing whether the person continues to meet the criteria for being subject to a mandatory outpatient treatment order pursuant to subsection B of §

37.2-817.01

or order for mandatory outpatient treatment following a period of involuntary inpatient treatment pursuant to subsection C or D of §

37.2-817.01

, as may be appropriate.

If, after observing the person, reviewing the report of the community services board provided pursuant to subsection C and considering the appointed examiner’s certification and any other relevant evidence submitted at the hearing, the court finds that the person continues to meet the criteria for mandatory outpatient treatment pursuant to subsection B, C, or D of §

37.2-817.01

, it may continue the order for a period not to exceed 180 days; in prescribing the terms of the order, including its length, the judge or special justice shall consider the impact on the person’s opportunities and obligations, including education and employment. Any order of mandatory outpatient treatment that is in effect at the time a petition for continuation of the order is filed shall remain in effect until the disposition of the hearing.

History.

2008, cc. 850, 870; 2010, cc. 330, 461; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 221; 2022, c. 763.

§ 37.2-818.
Commitment hearing for involuntary admission; recordings and records.

The district court judge or special justice shall make or cause to be made a tape or other audio recording of any hearings held under this chapter, with no more than one hearing recorded per tape, and shall submit the recording to the clerk of the district court in the locality in which the hearing is held to be retained in a confidential file. The person who was the subject of the hearing shall be entitled, upon request, to obtain a copy of the tape or other audio recording of such hearing. These recordings shall be retained for at least three years from the date of the commitment hearing.

Except as provided in this section and §

37.2-819

, the court shall keep its copies of recordings made pursuant to this section, relevant medical records, reports, and court documents pertaining to the hearings provided for in this chapter confidential. The person who is the subject of the hearing may, in writing, waive the confidentiality provided herein. In the absence of such waiver, access to the dispositional order only may be provided upon court order. Any person seeking access to the dispositional order may file a written motion setting forth why such access is needed. The court may issue an order to disclose the dispositional order if it finds that such disclosure is in the best interest of the person who is the subject of the hearing or of the public. The Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court and anyone acting on his behalf shall be provided access to the court’s records upon request. Such recordings, records, reports, and documents shall not be subject to the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.).

After entering an order for involuntary admission or mandatory outpatient treatment, the judge or special justice shall order that copies of the relevant records of the person be released to (i) the facility in which he is placed, (ii) the community services board of the jurisdiction where the person resides, (iii) any treatment providers identified in a treatment plan incorporated into any mandatory outpatient treatment order, and (iv) any other treatment providers or entities.

History.

1976, c. 671, § 37.1-67.3; 1979, c. 426; 1980, cc. 166, 582; 1982, c. 471; 1984, c. 277; 1985, c. 261; 1986, cc. 349, 609; 1988, c. 225; 1989, c. 716; 1990, cc. 59, 60, 728, 798; 1991, c. 636; 1992, c. 752; 1994, cc. 736, 907; 1995, cc. 489, 668, 844; 1996, cc. 343, 893; 1997, cc. 558, 921; 1998, c. 446; 2001, cc. 478, 479, 507, 658, 837; 2004, cc. 66, 1014; 2005, c. 716; 2008, cc. 806, 850, 870.

Cross references.

As to health records which are excluded from the provisions of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act, see §

2.2-3705.5

.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 806 substituted “every commitment hearing, with no more than one hearing recorded per tape” for “the commitment hearing” in the first sentence of subsection A.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 850 and 870 are identical, and rewrote the section.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-2010 Waiver of Confidentiality — Involuntary Commitment, et seq.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

10A M.J. Insane and Other Incompetent Persons, § 5.1.

§ 37.2-819.
Order of involuntary admission or mandatory outpatient treatment forwarded to CCRE; certain voluntary admissions forwarded to CCRE; firearm background check.

The order from a commitment hearing issued pursuant to this chapter for involuntary admission or mandatory outpatient treatment and the certification of any person who has been the subject of a temporary detention order pursuant to §

37.2-809

and who, after being advised by the judge or special justice that he will be prohibited from possessing a firearm pursuant to §

18.2-308.1:3

, subsequently agreed to voluntary admission pursuant to §

37.2-805

shall be filed by the judge or special justice with the clerk of the district court for the county or city where the hearing took place as soon as practicable but no later than the close of business on the next business day following the completion of the hearing.

Upon receipt of any order from a commitment hearing issued pursuant to this chapter for involuntary admission to a facility, the clerk of court shall, as soon as practicable but not later than the close of business on the next following business day, certify and forward to the Central Criminal Records Exchange, on a form provided by the Exchange, a copy of the order. Upon receipt of any order from a commitment hearing issued pursuant to this chapter for mandatory outpatient treatment, the clerk of court shall, prior to the close of that business day, certify and forward to the Central Criminal Records Exchange, on a form provided by the Exchange, a copy of the order.

The clerk of court shall also, as soon as practicable but no later than the close of business on the next following business day, forward upon receipt to the Central Criminal Records Exchange, on a form provided by the Exchange, certification of any person who has been the subject of a temporary detention order pursuant to §

37.2-809

, and who, after being advised by the judge or special justice that he will be prohibited from possessing a firearm pursuant to §

18.2-308.1:3

, subsequently agreed to voluntary admission pursuant to §

37.2-805

.

Except as provided in subdivision A 1 of §

19.2-389

, the copy of the forms and orders sent to the Central Criminal Records Exchange pursuant to subsection B, and the forms and certifications sent to the Central Criminal Records Exchange regarding voluntary admission pursuant to subsection C, shall be kept confidential in a separate file and used only to determine a person’s eligibility to possess, purchase, or transfer a firearm. No medical records shall be forwarded to the Central Criminal Records Exchange with any form, order, or certification required by subsection B or C. The Department of State Police shall forward only a person’s eligibility to possess, purchase, or transfer a firearm to the National Instant Criminal Background Check System.

History.

1976, c. 671, § 37.1-67.3; 1979, c. 426; 1980, cc. 166, 582; 1982, c. 471; 1984, c. 277; 1985, c. 261; 1986, cc. 349, 609; 1988, c. 225; 1989, c. 716; 1990, cc. 59, 60, 728, 798; 1991, c. 636; 1992, c. 752; 1994, cc. 736, 907; 1995, cc. 489, 668, 844; 1996, cc. 343, 893; 1997, cc. 558, 921; 1998, c. 446; 2001, cc. 478, 479, 507, 658, 837; 2004, cc. 66, 1014; 2005, c. 716; 2008, cc. 751, 788; 2009, cc. 21, 838; 2014, cc. 336, 374; 2015, c. 540.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 751 and 788 are identical, and designated the existing provisions of this section as subsection A and added subsections B and C; and rewrote subsection A.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by c. 21, effective February 23, 2009, and c. 838, effective April 8, 2009, rewrote subsection A; and substituted “shall also, as soon as practicable but no later than the close of business on the next following business day” for “shall also, prior to the close of that business day” in subsection B.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 336 and 374 are identical, and added subsection A and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly, and made related and stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 540 substituted “Except as provided in subdivision A 1 of §

19.2-389

, the” for “The” at the beginning of subsection D.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

State Police may provide mental health information to FBI to determine a person’s eligibility to possess, purchase, or transfer a firearm. —

The Department of State Police has the authority to provide certain mental health information maintained in the Central Criminal Records Exchange to the Federal Bureau of Investigation, so long as it is (i) kept confidential; and (ii) used only to determine a person’s eligibility to possess, purchase or transfer a firearm. See opinion of Attorney General to Colonel W. Gerald Massengill, Superintendent, Department of State Police, 01-062,
(4/4/02) (decided under prior law).

§ 37.2-820.
Place of hearing.

The hearing provided for pursuant to §§

37.2-814

through

37.2-819

may be conducted by the district court judge or a special justice at the convenient facility or other place open to the public provided for in §

37.2-809

, if he deems it advisable, even though the facility or place is located in a county or city other than his own. In conducting such hearings in a county or city other than his own, the judge or special justice shall have all of the authority and power that he would have in his own county or city. A district court judge or special justice of the county or city in which the facility or place is located may conduct the hearing provided for in §§

37.2-814

through

37.2-819

.

History.

1976, c. 671, § 37.1-67.4; 1981, c. 233; 1982, c. 435; 1986, c. 134; 1995, c. 844; 2005, c. 716.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Jurisdiction of special justices. —

Special justices serving the city of Norfolk have concurrent jurisdiction with special justices serving the city of Virginia Beach to conduct hearings under this section
only for persons detained in Virginia Beach for whom subject matter and in personam jurisdiction have been obtained by the Norfolk special justices from a temporary detention order issued under §

37.2-809

. Further, special justices serving Virginia Beach have jurisdiction to conduct commitment hearings for all persons located in Virginia Beach, including persons detained in Virginia Beach under a temporary detention order issued in another jurisdiction. See opinion of Attorney General to Judith Dockery, Esq., Special Justice, City of Virginia Beach, 08-014, 2008 Va. AG LEXIS 9 (4/1/08).

§ 37.2-821.
(Effective until October 1, 2022) Appeal of involuntary admission or certification order.

Any person involuntarily admitted to an inpatient facility or ordered to mandatory outpatient treatment pursuant to §§

37.2-814

through

37.2-819

or certified as eligible for admission pursuant to §

37.2-806

shall have the right to appeal the order to the circuit court in the jurisdiction where he was involuntarily admitted or ordered to mandatory outpatient treatment or certified or where the facility to which he was admitted is located. Choice of venue shall rest with such person. The court may transfer the case upon a finding that the other forum is more convenient. The clerk of the court from which an appeal is taken shall immediately transmit the record to the clerk of the appellate court. The clerk of the circuit court shall provide written notification of the appeal to the petitioner in the case in accordance with procedures set forth in § 16.1-112. No appeal bond or writ tax shall be required, and the appeal shall proceed without the payment of costs or other fees. Costs may be recovered as provided for in §

37.2-804

.

An appeal shall be filed within 10 days from the date of the order and shall be given priority over all other pending matters before the court and heard as soon as possible, notwithstanding §

19.2-241

regarding the time within which the court shall set criminal cases for trial. A petition for or the pendency of an appeal shall not suspend any order unless so ordered by a judge or special justice; however, a person may be released after a petition for or during the pendency of an appeal pursuant to §

37.2-837

or

37.2-838

. If the person is released during the pendency of an appeal, the appeal shall be in accordance with the provisions set forth in §§

37.2-844

and

37.2-846

.

The appeal shall be heard de novo in accordance with the provisions set forth in §§

37.2-802

,

37.2-804

,

37.2-804

.1,

37.2-804.2

, and

37.2-805

and (i) §

37.2-806

or (ii) §§

37.2-814

through

37.2-819

, except that the court in its discretion may rely upon the evaluation report in the commitment hearing from which the appeal is taken instead of requiring a new evaluation pursuant to §

37.2-815

. Any order of the circuit court shall not extend the period of involuntary admission or mandatory outpatient treatment set forth in the order appealed from.

An order continuing the involuntary admission shall be entered only if the criteria in §

37.2-817

are met at the time the appeal is heard.

Upon a finding by the court that the appellant no longer meets the criteria for involuntary admission or mandatory outpatient treatment, the court shall not dismiss the Commonwealth’s petition but shall reverse the order of the district court.

The person so admitted or certified shall be entitled to trial by jury. Seven persons from a panel of 13 shall constitute a jury.

If the person is not represented by counsel, the judge shall appoint an attorney to represent him. Counsel so appointed shall be paid a fee of $75 and his necessary expenses. The order of the court from which the appeal is taken shall be defended by the attorney for the Commonwealth.

History.

1977, c. 355, § 37.1-67.6; 1979, c. 204; 1980, c. 176; 1985, c. 106; 1990, c. 274; 2005, c. 716; 2006, c. 486; 2008, cc. 850, 870; 2010, cc. 544, 591; 2020, cc. 298, 1175.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 486 inserted the subsection designations and the second sentence in subsection B.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 850 and 870 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted “to an inpatient facility or ordered to mandatory outpatient treatment” and “or ordered to mandatory outpatient treatment” in the first sentence.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 544 and 591 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “such person” for “the party noting the appeal” in the second sentence and “10 days” for “30 days” in the fourth sentence and inserted the present fifth sentence; and in subsection B, in the first sentence, substituted “§§

37.2-802

,

37.2-804

,

37.2-804

.1,

37.2-804.2

, and

37.2-805

, and (i) §

37.2-806

or” for “§

37.2-806

or this article” and added clause (ii), deleted the former second sentence and inserted the present second sentence.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 298, in subsection A, deleted the fourth and fifth sentences, added the first paragraph of subsection B and redesignated the former paragraphs of subsection B as new subsections C, D and F; and redesignated former subsection C as subsection G.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1175, inserted subsection E.

§ 37.2-821.
(Effective October 1, 2022) Appeal of involuntary admission or certification order.

Any person involuntarily admitted to an inpatient facility or ordered to mandatory outpatient treatment pursuant to §§

37.2-814

through

37.2-819

or certified as eligible for admission pursuant to §

37.2-806

shall have the right to appeal the order to the circuit court in the jurisdiction where he was involuntarily admitted or ordered to mandatory outpatient treatment or certified or where the facility to which he was admitted is located. Choice of venue shall rest with such person. The court may transfer the case upon a finding that the other forum is more convenient. The clerk of the court from which an appeal is taken shall immediately transmit the record to the clerk of the appellate court. The clerk of the circuit court shall provide written notification of the appeal to the petitioner in the case in accordance with procedures set forth in § 16.1-112. No appeal bond or writ tax shall be required, and the appeal shall proceed without the payment of costs or other fees. Costs may be recovered as provided for in §

37.2-804

.

An appeal shall be filed within 10 days from the date of the order and shall be given priority over all other pending matters before the court and heard as soon as possible, notwithstanding §

19.2-241

regarding the time within which the court shall set criminal cases for trial. A petition for or the pendency of an appeal shall not suspend any order unless so ordered by a judge or special justice; however, a person may be released after a petition for or during the pendency of an appeal pursuant to §

37.2-837

or

37.2-838

. If the person is released during the pendency of an appeal, the appeal shall be in accordance with the provisions set forth in §§

37.2-844

and

37.2-846

.

The appeal shall be heard de novo in accordance with the provisions set forth in §§

37.2-802

,

37.2-804

,

37.2-804

.1,

37.2-804.2

, and

37.2-805

and (i) §

37.2-806

or (ii) §§

37.2-814

through

37.2-819

, except that the court in its discretion may rely upon the evaluation report in the commitment hearing from which the appeal is taken instead of requiring a new evaluation pursuant to §

37.2-815

. Any order of the circuit court shall not extend the period of involuntary admission or mandatory outpatient treatment set forth in the order appealed from.

An order continuing the involuntary inpatient admission shall be entered only if the criteria in §

37.2-817

are met at the time the appeal is heard. An order continuing mandatory outpatient treatment shall be entered only if the criteria set forth in §

37.2-817.01

are met at the time the appeal is heard.

Upon a finding by the court that the appellant no longer meets the criteria for involuntary admission or mandatory outpatient treatment, the court shall not dismiss the Commonwealth’s petition but shall reverse the order of the district court.

The person so admitted or certified shall be entitled to trial by jury. Seven persons from a panel of 13 shall constitute a jury.

If the person is not represented by counsel, the judge shall appoint an attorney to represent him. Counsel so appointed shall be paid a fee of $75 and his necessary expenses. The order of the court from which the appeal is taken shall be defended by the attorney for the Commonwealth.

History.

1977, c. 355, § 37.1-67.6; 1979, c. 204; 1980, c. 176; 1985, c. 106; 1990, c. 274; 2005, c. 716; 2006, c. 486; 2008, cc. 850, 870; 2010, cc. 544, 591; 2020, cc. 298, 1175; 2022, c. 763.

Editor's note.

Acts 2022, c. 763, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2022.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 763, inserted “inpatient” in the first sentence, and added the last sentence.

§ 37.2-822.
Treatment of person admitted while appeal is pending.

Whenever the director of any facility reasonably believes that treatment is necessary to protect the life, health, or safety of a person, treatment may be given during the period allowed for any appeal unless prohibited by order of a circuit court in the county or city wherein the appeal is pending.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 37-71.2, 37-204.1; 1964, c. 322; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-85; 1972, c. 639; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-823.
Examination of admission papers by director; examination of persons admitted.

Upon the receipt of any order for admission of any person, the director of the facility shall immediately examine the admission papers and, if they are found to be in substantial compliance with the law, he shall forthwith admit the person to the facility.

Any person presented for admission to a facility shall be examined within 24 hours after arrival by one or more of the physicians on the facility’s staff. If the examination reveals that there is sufficient cause to believe that the person has mental illness, he shall be retained at the facility; but if the examination reveals insufficient cause, the person shall be returned to the locality in which the petition was initiated or in which the person resides.

The Board shall adopt regulations to institute preadmission screening to prevent inappropriate admissions to state facilities.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 37-86.2, 37-90; 1950, pp. 908, 910; 1968, c. 477, §§ 37.1-68, 37.1-70; 1970, c. 673; 1972, c. 639; 1976, c. 671; 1980, c. 582; 2005, c. 716.

Law Review.

For note on the Virginia procedure for commitment and release of persons acquitted by reason of insanity, see 11 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 185 (1969).

For note on the constitutional perspective of involuntary civil commitment, see 30 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 646 (1973).

§ 37.2-824.
Periodic review of all persons for purposes of retention.

The director of a state facility shall conduct a review of the progress of each person admitted to the facility at intervals of 30, 60, and 90 days after admission of the person, and every six months thereafter to determine whether the person should be retained at the state facility. A record shall be kept of the findings of each review in the state facility’s file on the person.

History.

1974, c. 66, § 37.1-84.2; 1976, c. 671; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-825.
Admission raises no presumption of legal incapacity.

The admission of any person to a facility shall not, of itself, create a presumption of legal incapacity.

History.

1968, c. 477, § 37.1-87; 1997, c. 801; 2005, c. 716.